Idaho, session 2025, S1097.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-5203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5203. APPROVAL OF PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS. (1) No whole Any school
district may be converted to a charter district or any configuration that in-
cludes all schools as public charter schools.
(2)(a) The authorizer must receive an application no later than Septem-
ber 1 for a new public charter school to be eligible to begin instruc-
tion the first complete school year following receipt of the applica-
tion, unless the authorizer agrees to a later date; and
(b) To begin operations, a newly chartered public school must be autho-
rized by no later than January 1 of the previous school year, unless the
authorizer agrees to a later date.
(3) Any authorizer may approve a public charter school formed by creat-
ing a new public charter school or by replicating an existing public charter
school. Converting an existing traditional public school or public school
district to a public charter school or charter district may only be approved
only by the board of trustees of the school district in which the existing
public school is or schools are located.
(4) No charter shall be approved under this chapter:
(a) That provides for the conversion of any existing private or
parochial school to a public charter school;
(b) For a for-profit entity; provided, however, nothing in this section
shall prevent the board of directors of a public charter school from
legally contracting with an educational service provider that provides
comprehensive educational administrative and management services or
with for-profit entities for the provision of products or services that
aid in the operation of the school; or
(c) By the board of trustees of a school district if the public charter
school's physical location is outside the boundaries of the authorizing
school district.
(5) A charter holder may not operate enterprises unrelated to the edu-
cational purposes for which the public charter school has been authorized.
In cases of related enterprises, including but not limited to daycare and af-
ter school programs, no state education funding authorized pursuant to this
chapter may be used to subsidize such related enterprises.


(6)(a) Each authorized public charter school is hereby designated as a
local education agency (LEA) as such term is defined in 34 CFR 300.28,
unless the charter holder and authorizer agree that:
(i) Public charter schools authorized by the board of trustees of
a school district may be included in that district's LEA; or
(ii) Entities with multiple charters may operate as a single LEA.
(b) Notice of an agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
must be provided to the state department of education by no later than
February 1 of the proceeding school year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.